Utah statutes.
32A-3-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Qualifications.
(1) (a)  The commission may not grant a package agency to any person who has
been convicted of:
(i)  a felony under any federal or state law;
(ii)  any violation of any federal or state law or local ordinance concerning
the sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or
transportation of alcoholic beverages;
(iii)  any crime involving moral turpitude; or
(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which
the package agency is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, any
drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug.
(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company,
the  proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any of the following has
been convicted of any offense described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a partner;
(ii)  a managing agent;
(iii)  a manager;
(iv)  an officer;
(v)  a director;
(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation; or
(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company.
(c)  The proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any person employed
to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for a package agency has been
convicted of any offense described in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke the package agency and
terminate the package agency agreement
if after the day on which the package agency is granted a person described in
Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is found to have been convicted of any offense described in Subsection
(1)(a) prior to the package agency being granted; or
(b)  on or after the day on which the package agency is granted:
(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or
(iii); or
(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(A).
(3) The director may take emergency action by immediately suspending the
operation of the package agency for the period during which the criminal
matter is being adjudicated if a person described in Subsection (1)(a), (b),
or (c):
(a)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any
drug; and
(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and any drug within five years before the
day on which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection
(3)(b)(i).
(4) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a package agency to any person who
has had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
within the last three years.
(ii)  The commission may not grant a package agency to any applicant that is a
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any partner,
managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who holds at least 20%
of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation, or
member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability company is or
was:
(A)  a partner or managing agent of any partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of any corporation that
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
within the last three years; or
(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of any limited
liability company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under
this title revoked within the last three years.
(b) An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company may not be granted a package agency if any of the following had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked while
acting in that person's individual capacity within the last three years:
(i)  any partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  any managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  any manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted a package
agency if that person was:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the
last three years; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owned at least 20% of the limited liability
company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(5) (a)  Each package agency shall be operated by a natural person, who is
either:
(i)  the package agent; or
(ii)  another natural person that package agent designates.
(b)  Each designee shall be:
(i)  an employee of the package agent; and
(ii)  responsible for the operation of the agency.
(c)  The conduct of the designee shall be attributable to the package agent.
(d)  The package agent shall provide the name of the person operating the
package agency to the department for the department's approval.
(e)  The name and title of any designee shall be stated on the application for
the package agency.
(f)  The package agent shall:
(i)  inform the department of any proposed change in the person designated to
operate the agency; and
(ii)  receive prior approval from the department before implementing the
change as described in this Subsection (5)(f).
(g)  Failure to comply with the requirements of this Subsection (5) may result
in the immediate termination of the package agency agreement.
(6) (a)  A minor may not be:
(i)  granted a package agency; or
(ii)  employed by a package agent to handle liquor.
(b)  The commission may not grant a package agency to an applicant that is a
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any of the following
is a minor:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(7)  If any package agent no longer possesses the qualifications required by
this title for obtaining a package agency, the commission may terminate the
package agency contract.
